Hawaii statutes.
[§482D-8] Violation of trademarking
requirement. Any person, being a manufacturer or dealer of gold or silver
articles of merchandise, who sells or possesses articles which are not stamped
with a trademark as required by section 482D-6 shall:

(1) Be guilty of a misdemeanor for the first offense;
and

(2) Be guilty of a class C felony for any subsequent
offense. [L 1990, c 343, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next